Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-1411
Notice of changes; return of pocket card; required when.

If a motor vehicle dealer, motorcycle dealer, or trailer dealer changes the address of his or her place of business, changes franchise, adds another franchise, or loses a franchise for sale of new motor vehicles, motorcycles, or trailers, the dealer shall notify the board of such change within ten days prior to such change. Thereupon the license shall be corrected for the unexpired portion of the term at no additional fee except as provided in section 60-1411.01.

If a dealer's agent changes his or her agent's status with any dealer, the agent shall notify the board. If the agent is no longer contracting with any dealer, the dealer's agent license shall lapse and the license and pocket card shall be returned to the board.

Laws 1957, c. 280, § 11, p. 1020;

Laws 1963, c. 365, § 8, p. 1174;

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 10;

Laws 1972, LB 1335, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 498, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB346, § 7.